dictsource/en_rules
        l (_       l
    A') ll         l
     A) ll         l
     A) l (ly_     l
     y) ll         l
     A) ll (A      l
     A) l (less_   l
        l (C       l
        ll (C      l
     _) llan       l#%an
        l (E       l
        lle (_     l
    %C) l (eC_     l
    %C) l (est_    l
  @@ba) lled (_S2v d
    @@) lled (_S3v d
     B) l (_       @L
     w) l (_       l
     r) l (_       l
    Al) l (_ 
     _) libre (P5  li:br@
     _) lib (rett  lI2b
     &) like (_S4  laIk
     &) lim (ent   lIm
    &B) ling (_    lI2N
    &B) lings (_   lI2Nz
    ng) ling (_    @-lI2N
    &t) ling (_    @LI2N
    &l) ling (_S4vd IN
        linux      lInVks
     _) lo (gK     lO2
     @) lo (gous   =l@
        lu (na     lu:
     &) ly (_S2i   l%i
    &l) ly (_S2    i
     f) ly (_      laI
   ief) ly (_S2    l%i
    ff) ly (_S2    l%i
    of) ly (_S2    l%i
  &ful) ly (_S2m   l%i
     o) ly (_      l%i
multip) ly         laI
    &p) ly (_S2    l%i
     p) ly (_      laI
     _) ly (d      lI
     &) lEss (_S4i l@s
     @) lEssly (_S6i l@sl%i

.group le
     &) le (_      l
    &C) le (_      @L
?8  &C) le (_      El
// Indian English: [əl] (little, people, simple), not the full [ɛl] of ?8.
// Named letters, so these outscore the ?8 rule's consonant class.
?12 &b) le (_      @l
?12 &c) le (_      @l
?12 &d) le (_      @l
?12 &f) le (_      @l
?12 &g) le (_      @l
?12 &k) le (_      @l
?12 &m) le (_      @l
?12 &n) le (_      @l
?12 &p) le (_      @l
?12 &s) le (_      @l
?12 &t) le (_      @l
?12 &v) le (_      @l
?12 &x) le (_      @l
?12 &z) le (_      @l
    %C) le         @L
    %C) le (y_     l
    &r) le (_      l
        legged     lEgId
     C) le (ton_   @L
    Ab) ler (_     l3
    Ab) le (B_     l@
    Ab) led (_     @Ld
     &) lem (ent   @Lm
    &p) lem (ent   lIm
    %C) le (Bia    l'i:
    @b) le (C@     @L
    @b) ler (C@    l3
    @d) le (C@     @L
    @g) le (C@     @L
    @t) le (C@     @L
    @t) le (te_    l@  // gauntleted
    @t) le (ry_    l3
    tt) le (@      @-l
    &C) le (ss     l@
     @) less (_S4i l@s
     @) lessly (_S6i l@sl%i
     @) lessness (_S8i l@sn@s
?8   @) less (_S4i lEs
?8   @) lessly (_S6i lEsl%i
?8   @) lessness (_S8i lEsnEs
        le (vel+   lE
     c) leve (l    li:v


.group m
        m          m
        mm         m
     _) mn (e      n
    Ch) m (_       @m
     B) m (_       @m
     l) m (_       m
     _) mac (adP3  m@k
     _) mac (bP3   m@k
     _) mac (dP3   m@k
     _) mac (lP3   m@k
     _) mac (mP3   m@k
     _) machia     maki@
     _) mal (fP3   m,al
     _) mal (ig    m@l
     _) mal (ev    m@l
     _) mal (nP3   m,al
     _) mal (pP3   m,al
     _) mal (trP3  m,al
?!3     mayor      me@
        mb (_      m
        mb (nail   m
        mbly       mbl%I
        mb (d      m
     o) mb (e      m
   _bo) mb (K      m
   _du) mb (K      m
     _) mc (C@P2   m@k
     _) mc (_C     m@k
     _) mc (_L05   m@        // c,g,k
     _) mc (L05@   m@
     _) mc (A      m@k
     _) mc (_A     m@k
     _) mc (in     mak
        mn (_      m
    &B) me (_      m%I
     _) mega       mEg@
     @) men (_     mEn
     @) men (_$w_alt2 m@n
     &) ment (_S4  m@nt
     &) ments (_S5 m@nt|s
     &) ment's (_S6 m@nt|s
?8   &) ment (_S4  mEnt
?8   &) ments (_S5 mEnt|s
        mEnt (_    m@nt
   tor) me (nt+    m'E
     C) mented     m'EntId
        mEntary (_ m'Ent@r%i
     _) meso (amP4  m,EsoU
     _) meta (@    m,Et@
     _) metal (C   mEt@L
     _) metall (ic m@tal
        metabo     m@t'ab0
     _) meta (llu  m%Eta
        mh (ao     w		// Irish, e.g. 'mhaol' /weIl/
   aoi) mh (e      v		// Irish, e.g. 'Caoimhe' /ki:v@/
     &) mobile     m@bi:l
     _) mocha      moUk@
        mono (ga   m@n'0
        mo (noto   m@
     _) mono       m0noU
        mon (opolL02  m@n
        mon (ox    mVn
     @) most (_S4  moUst
     &) mouth (_   m@T
     &) mouth (_$w_alt1 maUT
     _) multi      mVlti
     _) multi (pl  m,VltI
     _) multi (@@P5 m,VltI

.group mi
     _) mid (e     mI2d
     _) mid (pr    mI2d
     _) middle (e  m,Id@L
        millen     mI2lEn
     _) milli      mIlI
     _) mill (ion  mIl
     _) mis (@P3   mI2s      // prefix
        mis (chie  mIs
     _) misc (e    mI2s
     _) misci (b   mIs@
        mis (dem   mIs
        mis (er    maIz
        miserab    mIz@-r@b
        mis (fi    mIs
        mis (hap   mIs
     _) mis (in    m,Is
        mish (ma   mIS
     _) miss       mIs
     _) mi (ssi    mI
     _) mis (sCP3  mI2s
     _) mis (ti    mIs
     _) mis (tim   m%Is
     _) mis (tit   m%Is
        mis (ty    mIs
        mistle     mIs@L
        mis (tral  mIs
        mis (tres  mIs
        mi (sta    mI2
        micr (o    maIkr
     _) micro (ph  maIkr@
        micro (sco maIkr@
        micro (grap maIkr@
     _) micro (@P5 m'aIkroU
     _) micro (@@@P5 m,aIkroU
     _) micro (b   maIkroU
     _) mi (nAr    maI
     _) mi (nera   mI

.group n
        n          n
     n) n 
     _) n (gY+     @-N

     &) name (_S4  neIm
     _) nano (P4   n,anoU
        nause      nO:sI
     _) navig      navIg
        necessit   n@sEsIt
     &) ness (_S4im n@s
?8   &) ness (_S4im nEs
     @) n (ch      n
    2_) nd (_ 
    &B) ne (_      n%I
    &n) ne (_ 
     _) neo        ni:oU
     _) news (P4   n'ju:z
?3   _) news (P4   n'u:z
        n (x       N
        n (kn      n
        n't        @-nt
     A) n't        nt
     E) n (_       @n
     B) n (_       @n
     g) n (ing+    n
     n) n (_ 
     g) n (_       n
     l) n (_       n
        ninth      naInT
        n (Co_     =n
     _) noauto (P6 noUO:toU
     _) non (@P3   n,0n
        nonchala (n n0nS@l@
?3      nonchala (n n0nS@l'A:
     _) nurse (B   n3:s
     &) nut (_S3   nVt
     &) nya (_     =nj@

.group ng
        ng         N
        ng (l      Ng
        ng (r      Ng
        ng (A      Ng
        ng (ina    ndZ
        ng (ie_    ndZ
        ng (iti    ndZ
        ng (e      ndZ
   _ri) ng (e      Ng
        ng (y      N
    mA) ng (y      ndZ
     u) ng (y      ndZ
        nged       ndZd
   %Ci) nged       Nd
     a) nged       Nd
    li) nged       Nd
     o) nged       Nd
   spo) nged       ndZd
    _a) ng (er     Ng
    ba) ng (er     Ng
   cla) ng (er     Ng
        ngi (b     ndZI2
     i) ng (er     Ng
    ri) ng (er     N
    si) ng (er     N
    bi) ng (er     ndZ
    gi) ng (er     ndZ
     o) ng (er     Ng
   you) ng (er     Ng
    co) nge (st    ndZE
   cri) nging      ndZI2N
    hi) nging      ndZI2N
     u) nging (_   ndZI2N
   _lo) ng (it     ndZ
        ngue       N

.group o
        o          0
     _) o          0
     _) o's (_     oUz
     X) o          0#
!?3 _h) o (lt      0
     X) o ($w_alt3+++ %0#
     _) o' (P2     %oU       // prefix
        o'er       o@
        o (Ba_     'oU
     _) o (Bal     oU
    XC) o (Bal     oU
     X) o (By_     oU
     _) o (Cy+     0
        o (Be#     oU
        oi (ce#    OI
        o (BeCo_   0
        o (BenC    oU
        o (Beon    'oU
        o (BiA     oU
        o (Bing    oU
    XC) o (Bus_    oU
        o (Cagh_   oU
        o (Cemic   0
        o (Cet_    0
        o (Ci_     'oU
        o (Cic_    '0
        o (Cical   '0
        o (Co_     'oU
        o (Coist   'oU
        o (_       oU
    ig) o (_       oU
   @@C) o (_       =oU
        oa         oU
        oa (_      'oU@
        oa (b      oUa
     g) oa (n_     oU@
     z) oa (n_     'oU@
    br) oa (d      O:
        oar        o@
        oar (_     o@
    cr) o (at      oU
     X) o (ba      oU
    _t) o (bac     @
        o (bed     oU
     _) o (beis    %oU
    _r) o (ber     0
     _) o (bes     %oU
        o (bic_    'oU
     n) o (bil     oU
    _m) o (bil     oU
    gl) o (bin     'oU
        o (bje     %0
     _) o (bl      %0#
     _) o (blat    %oU
     n) o (bl      oU
        o (bliga   0
        o (bligato %0#
        o (blo     0
    _r) o (bo      oU
     _) o (bs      %0
?3   _) o (bs      %0#
     _) obs (er    %0bz
?3   _) obs (er    %0#bz
        obso (l    0bs@
        o (bstin   0
     _) o (bt      %0
?3   _) o (bt      %0#
        o (by_     oU
     f) o (cA      oU
    _l) o (cA      oU
    _v) o (cA      oU
    ff) o (cA      @
     l) o (cat     %oU
     _) o (ccasi   @
     _) o (cclu    @
        ocean      oUS@n
        ocean (ic  oUSIan
     X) o (ct      0
        occur      @k3:
?5      occur      @kVR
        occurr     @k3:
?5      occurr     @kVR
    tr) och        oUk
     d) o (cil     oU
   &%C) ock (_     @k
     l) o (com     ,oU
        ocrates (_ '0kra#ti:z
        o (cre_    'oU
     _) octo (@    0kt@
 pickp) o (cket    ,0
    _h) o (cu      oU
    cr) o (cu      oU
        o (cyte_   =@
     _) o (dA      oU
    _b) o (dy      0
  cust) o (d       @
     k) o (dA      oU
  meth) o (d_      @
  peri) o (d_      @
     d) o (dec     %oU
     m) o (del     0
     m) o (der     0
     m) o (dest    0
  cust) o (di      'oU
        odor       oUd3
    mm) o (dor     @
        odo (rA    oUd@
        odour      oUd3
     &) o (dy_     @
     b) o (dy_     0
        oe         oU
  hydr) o (e       oU
    sh) oe (+      u:
        oea (_     'i@
     _) oe (d      i:
        oe (m_     oUI
?3      oe (m_     oUI#
        oer        oU3
     _) oe (s      i:
     &) oe (s_S2   z
        oesopha    I2s0f@
     d) oer (_     u:3
     p) oe (t      oUI
     f) oe (tA     i:
     p) oe (ti     oUE
        oe (ve     ,oU'E
     &) o (ff      O2
     _) o (ff      O2
     c) o (ff      O2
        of (fen    @
        o (ffic    0
        o (ffici   @
        o (ft      O2
        o (gan_    oU
    @l) oge (_     0g
     &) o (gen_    @
        ogeni (c   oUdZ'EnI
        o (genat   '0
        o (genous  '0
        o (geny    '0
     r) o (ger     0
     l) ogism      =@dZIz@m
     l) ogne (_    'oUn
     @) ographer   '0gr@f3
     _) og (re     oUg
     r) ogu (L04   oUg
     v) ogu (L04   oUg
    @@) ogue       0g
    @l) og (y      =@dZ
    @l) og (ist_   =@dZ
        og (etic   @dZ
        oh         oU
        o (hA      oU
     j) oh (n      0
        oi         OI
        oi (na_    'OI
        oia        OI@
        oi (c      oUI2
        oi (c_     'oUI2
        oi (ce     OI
        oi (ck     OI
     A) oi (zA     oUaI
        oiy (A_    'OI
        o (imag    oU
     c) o (inci    %oU
        o (ing     oU
     d) o (ing     u:
        oir        wA@
        oire       wA@
     @) ois (_     wA:
     u) ois (_     OI
    rt) oise       @s
   orp) oise       @s
        o (ism     oU
     @) o (ist     oU
        oix (_     wA:
    tr) o (jan     oU
        o (ku      oU
        o (ky_     oU
     g) o (ng      O2
     l) o (ng      O2
     r) o (ng      O2
     s) o (ng      O2
     t) o (ngu     V
        o (que_    oU
        o (shA_    oU
   tar) ot (_      oU
    _C) o (ti      oU
        o (tion    oU
     m) o (x       @
        o (x++     0
        ox (ide    '0ks
        oxy        0ksI
  hydr) oxy        '0ksI
     _) oxy (@@    ,0ksI2
     _) oxy (g     0ksI
        oy         OI
        oy (A_     'OI
     d) o (zen     V
     _) o (zo      oU
